Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Security Entitlements.

Sec. 45.08.501.
Acquisition of security entitlement from securities intermediary; securities account.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) and (c) of this section, a person acquires a security entitlement if a securities intermediary

indicates by book entry that a financial asset has been credited to the person’s securities account;

receives a financial asset from the person or acquires a financial asset for the person and, in either case, accepts the asset for credit to the person’s securities account; or

becomes obligated under another law, regulation, or rule to credit a financial asset to the person’s securities account.

If a condition of (a) of this section has been met, a person has a security entitlement even if the securities intermediary does not itself hold the financial asset.

If a securities intermediary holds a financial asset for another person, and the financial asset is registered in the name of, payable to the order of, or specially endorsed to the other person, and has not been endorsed to the securities intermediary or in blank, the other person is treated as holding the financial asset directly rather than as having a security entitlement with respect to the financial asset.

Issuance of a security is not establishment of a security entitlement.

In this chapter, “securities account” means an account to which a financial asset is or may be credited in accordance with an agreement under which the person maintaining the account undertakes to treat the person for whom the account is maintained as entitled to exercise the rights that comprise the financial asset.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.502.
Assertion of adverse claim against entitlement holder.

An action based on an adverse claim to a financial asset, whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against a person who acquires a security entitlement under AS

45.08.501

for value and without notice of the adverse claim.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.503.
Property interest of entitlement holder in financial asset held by securities intermediary.

To the extent necessary for a securities intermediary to satisfy all security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, all interests in that financial asset held by the securities intermediary are held by the securities intermediary for the entitlement holders, are not property of the securities intermediary, and are not subject to claims of creditors of the securities intermediary, except as otherwise provided in AS

45.08.511

.

An entitlement holder’s property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under (a) of this section is a pro rata property interest in all interests in that financial asset held by the securities intermediary, without regard to the time the entitlement holder acquired the security entitlement or the time the securities intermediary acquired the interest in that financial asset.

An entitlement holder’s property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under (a) of this section may not be enforced against the securities intermediary unless the interest is enforced by exercising the entitlement holder’s rights under AS

45.08.505

—

45.08.508

.

An entitlement holder’s property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under (a) of this section may not be enforced against a purchaser of the financial asset or of an interest in the financial asset, unless

insolvency proceedings have been initiated by or against the securities intermediary;

the securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in the financial asset to satisfy the security entitlements of all of the intermediary’s entitlement holders to that financial asset;

the securities intermediary violated the intermediary’s obligations under AS

45.08.504

by transferring the financial asset or interest in the financial asset to the purchaser; and

the purchaser is not protected under (f) of this section.

Under (d) of this section, the trustee or other liquidator, acting on behalf of all entitlement holders having security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, may recover the financial asset, or the interest in the financial asset, from the purchaser; if the trustee or other liquidator elects not to pursue this right of recovery, an entitlement holder whose security entitlement remains unsatisfied has the right to recover the entitlement holder’s interest in the financial asset from the purchaser.

An action based on the entitlement holder’s property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under (a) of this section, whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against a purchaser of a financial asset or an interest in a financial asset who gives value, obtains control, and does not act in collusion with the securities intermediary in violating the securities intermediary’s obligations under AS

45.08.504

.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.504.
Duty of securities intermediary to maintain financial asset.

A securities intermediary shall promptly obtain and maintain a financial asset in a quantity corresponding to the aggregate of all security entitlements the securities intermediary has established in favor of the securities intermediary’s entitlement holders with respect to that financial asset. The securities intermediary may maintain those financial assets directly or through one or more other securities intermediaries.

Except to the extent otherwise agreed by its entitlement holder, a securities intermediary may not grant a security interest in a financial asset the securities intermediary is obligated to maintain under (a) of this section.

A securities intermediary satisfies the duty in (a) of this section if

the securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary; or

in the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to obtain and maintain the financial asset.

This section does not apply to a clearing corporation if the clearing corporation is the obligor of an option or similar obligation to which the entitlement holders of the clearing corporation have security entitlements.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.505.
Duty of securities intermediary with respect to payments and distributions.

A securities intermediary shall take action to obtain a payment or distribution made by the issuer of a financial asset. A securities intermediary satisfies the duty if

the securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary; or

in the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to attempt to obtain the payment or distribution.

A securities intermediary is obligated to the securities intermediary’s entitlement holder for a payment or distribution made by the issuer of a financial asset if the payment or distribution is received by the securities intermediary.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.506.
Duty of securities intermediary to exercise rights as directed by entitlement holder.

A securities intermediary shall exercise rights with respect to a financial asset if directed by an entitlement holder to exercise the rights. A securities intermediary satisfies the duty if

the securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary; or

in the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary either places the entitlement holder in a position to exercise the rights directly or exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to follow the direction of the entitlement holder.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.507.
Duty of securities intermediary to comply with entitlement order.

A securities intermediary shall comply with an entitlement order if the entitlement order is originated by the appropriate person, the securities intermediary has had reasonable opportunity to assure itself that the entitlement order is genuine and authorized, and the securities intermediary has had reasonable opportunity to comply with the entitlement order. A securities intermediary satisfies the duty if

the securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary; or

in the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to comply with the entitlement order.

If a securities intermediary transfers a financial asset under an ineffective entitlement order, the securities intermediary shall reestablish a security entitlement in favor of the person entitled to the entitlement order, and pay or credit payments or distributions that the person did not receive as a result of the wrongful transfer. If the securities intermediary does not reestablish a security entitlement, the securities intermediary is liable to the entitlement holder for damages.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.508.
Duty of securities intermediary to change entitlement holder’s position to other form of security holding.

A securities intermediary shall act at the direction of an entitlement holder to change a security entitlement into another available form of holding for which the entitlement holder is eligible or to cause the financial asset to be transferred to a securities account of the entitlement holder with another securities intermediary. A securities intermediary satisfies the duty if

the securities intermediary acts as agreed upon by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary; or

in the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to follow the direction of the entitlement holder.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.509.
Specification of duties of securities intermediary by other statute, regulation, or rule; manner of performance of duties of securities intermediary and exercise of rights of entitlement holder.

If the substance of a duty imposed upon a securities intermediary by AS

45.08.504

—

45.08.508

is the subject of other statute, regulation, or rule, compliance with that statute, regulation, or rule satisfies the duty.

To the extent that specific standards for the performance of the duties of a securities intermediary or the exercise of the rights of an entitlement holder are not specified by other statute, regulation, or rule or by agreement between the securities intermediary and entitlement holder, the securities intermediary shall perform the duties of the securities intermediary and the entitlement holder shall exercise the rights of the entitlement holder in a commercially reasonable manner.

The obligation of a securities intermediary to perform the duties imposed by AS

45.08.504

—

45.08.508

is subject to the rights of the securities intermediary

arising out of a security interest under a security agreement with the entitlement holder or otherwise; and

under other law, regulation, rule, or agreement to withhold performance of the duties of the securities intermediary as a result of unfulfilled obligations of the entitlement holder to the securities intermediary.

AS

45.08.504

—

45.08.508

do not require a securities intermediary to take action that is prohibited by other statute, regulation, or rule.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.08.510.
Rights of purchaser of security entitlement from entitlement holder.

In a case not covered by the priority rules in AS 45.29 or the rules stated in (c) of this section, an action based on an adverse claim to a financial asset or security entitlement, whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory, may not be asserted against a person who purchases a security entitlement, or an interest in a security entitlement, from an entitlement holder if the purchaser gives value, does not have notice of the adverse claim, and obtains control.

If an adverse claim could not have been asserted against an entitlement holder under AS

45.08.502

, the adverse claim cannot be asserted against a person who purchases a security entitlement, or an interest in a security entitlement, from the entitlement holder.

In a case not covered by the priority rules in AS 45.29, a purchaser for value of a security entitlement, or an interest in a security entitlement, who obtains control has priority over a purchaser of a security entitlement, or an interest in a security entitlement, who does not obtain control. Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, purchasers who have control rank according to priority in time of

the purchaser’s becoming the person for whom the securities account in which the security entitlement is carried is maintained, if the purchaser obtained control under AS

45.08.106(d)(1)

;

the securities intermediary’s agreement to comply with the purchaser’s entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities account in which the security entitlement is carried if the purchaser obtained control under AS

45.08.106(d)(2)

; or

if the purchaser obtained control through another person under AS

45.08.106(d)(3)

, the time on which priority would be based under this subsection if the other person were the secured party.

A securities intermediary as purchaser has priority over a conflicting purchaser who has control unless otherwise agreed by the securities intermediary.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996; am §§ 21 — 23 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.08.511.
Priority among security interests and entitlement holders.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) and (c) of this section, if a securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in a particular financial asset to satisfy both the securities intermediary’s obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements to that financial asset and the securities intermediary’s obligation to a creditor of the securities intermediary who has a security interest in the financial asset, the claims of entitlement holders, other than the creditor, have priority over the claim of the creditor.

A claim of a creditor of a securities intermediary who has a security interest in a financial asset held by a securities intermediary has priority over claims of the securities intermediary’s entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to the financial asset if the creditor has control over the financial asset.

If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient financial assets to satisfy both the clearing corporation’s obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to a financial asset and the clearing corporation’s obligation to a creditor of the clearing corporation who has a security interest in the financial asset, the claim of the creditor has priority over the claims of entitlement holders.

History.

(§ 47 ch 17 SLA 1996)